Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-130] Commissioner's authority to
grant waiver. Upon the receiving of a written request and a showing of
good cause, the commissioner shall have the authority to grant a waiver of any
requirement of an insurance law or insurance rule as applied to an applicant or
a producer. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next